Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201521-20,160
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10; Laws 2015, LB279, § 19. Operative date January 1, 2017. Administrative dissolution; reinstatement.

(1) A corporation administratively dissolved under section 21-20,159 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement within five years after the effective date of its administrative dissolution. The application shall:

(a) Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

(b) State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

(c) State that the corporation's name satisfies the requirements of section 21-2028.

(2) If the Secretary of State determines (a) that the application for reinstatement contains the information required by subsection (1) of this section and that the information is correct, and (b) that the corporation has paid to the Secretary of State all delinquent occupation taxes and has forwarded to the Secretary of State a properly executed and signed biennial report for the current year, he or she shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites his or her determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under section 21-2034.

(3) A corporation that has been administratively dissolved under section 21-20,159 for more than five years may apply to the Secretary of State for late reinstatement. The application, along with the fee set forth in section 21-2005, shall:

(a) Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

(b) State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

(c) State that the corporation's name satisfies the requirements of section 21-2028;

(d) State that a legitimate reason exists for reinstatement and what such legitimate reason is; and

(e) State that such reinstatement does not constitute fraud on the public.

(4) If the Secretary of State determines (a) that the application for late reinstatement contains the information required by subsection (3) of this section and that the information is correct and (b) that the corporation has paid to the Secretary of State all delinquent occupation taxes and has forwarded to the Secretary of State a properly executed and signed biennial report for the current year, he or she shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of late reinstatement that recites his or her determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under section 21-2034.

(5) When the reinstatement is effective, it shall relate back to and take effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the corporation shall resume carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 160;

Laws 2012, LB854, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB279, § 13.
March 19, 2015
Biennial report, see section 21-301.

Occupation tax, see Chapter 21, article 3.